Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 9. Salmon Hatcheries.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose related to AS

16.10.375

—

16.10.560

, see
§ 1, ch. 59, SLA 1979, in the 1979 Temporary and Special Acts and Resolves.

Sec. 16.10.375.
Regional salmon plans.

The commissioner shall designate regions of the state for the purpose of salmon production and have developed and amend as necessary a comprehensive salmon plan for each region, including provisions for both public and private nonprofit hatchery systems. Subject to plan approval by the commissioner, comprehensive salmon plans shall be developed by regional planning teams consisting of department personnel and representatives of the appropriate qualified regional associations formed under AS

16.10.380

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 161 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 154 SLA 1977)

Administrative Code. —

For applicability of regulations, see 5 AAC 40, art. 3.

For permit application procedures, see 5 AAC 40, art. 4.

For regional comprehensive planning, see 5 AAC 40, art. 5.

Sec. 16.10.380.
Regional associations.

The commissioner shall assist in and encourage the formation of qualified regional associations for the purpose of enhancing salmon production. A regional association is qualified if the commissioner determines that it

is comprised of associations representative of commercial fishermen in the region;

includes representatives of other user groups interested in fisheries within the region who wish to belong; and

possesses a board of directors that includes no less than one representative of each user group that belongs to the association.

A qualified regional association, when it becomes a nonprofit corporation under AS 10.20, is established as a service area in the unorganized borough under AS

29.03.020

for the purpose of providing salmon enhancement services.

In this section “user group” includes, but is not limited to, sport fishermen, processors, commercial fishermen, subsistence fishermen, and representatives of local communities.

History.

(§ 2 ch 161 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 59 SLA 1979)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, subsection (b) was relettered as (c) and (c) was relettered as (b).

Administrative Code. —

For regional comprehensive planning, see 5 AAC 40, art. 5.

Sec. 16.10.400.
Permits for salmon hatcheries.

The commissioner or a designee may issue a permit, subject to the restrictions imposed by statute or regulation under AS

16.10.400

—

16.10.470

, to a nonprofit corporation organized under AS 10.20, after the permit application has been reviewed by the regional planning team, for

the construction and operation of a salmon hatchery;

the operation of a hatchery under AS

16.10.480

.

The application for a permit under this section shall be on a form prescribed by the department and be accompanied by an application fee of $100. The commissioner may waive the submission of an application for a permit to operate a hatchery under AS

16.10.480

.

A hatchery permit is nontransferable. If a permit holder sells or leases a hatchery for which a permit is issued under this section, the new operator shall apply for a new permit under this section.

[Repealed, § 19 ch 154 SLA 1977.]

A qualified regional association formed under AS

16.10.380

, if it has become a nonprofit corporation under AS 10.20, has a preference right to a permit under (a)(1) of this section if its proposed hatchery is provided for in the comprehensive plan for that region developed under AS

16.10.375

and the fresh water source exceeds one cubic foot per second minimum flow. Another local nonprofit hatchery corporation approved by a qualified regional association has an identical preference right.

Except for permits issued before June 16, 1976, a permit may not be issued for construction or operation of a hatchery on an anadromous fish stream unless the stream has been classified as suitable for enhancement purposes by the commissioner. The commissioner shall undertake to make such classifications in conjunction with the development of the comprehensive plan under AS

16.10.375

.

During the development of a comprehensive plan for a region a permit may not be issued for a hatchery unless the commissioner determines that the action would result in substantial public benefits and would not jeopardize natural stocks.

History.

(§ 2 ch 111 SLA 1974; am § 3 ch 161 SLA 1976; am §§ 3, 19 ch 154 SLA 1977; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 14 SLA 1988)

Cross references. —

For legislative intent in connection with the enactment of AS

16.10.400

—

16.10.470

, see § 1, ch. 111, SLA 1974, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For permit application procedures, see 5 AAC 40, art. 4.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Since the conditions for issuance of a hatchery permit do not appear to be inconsistent with the operation of a fish processing and marketing facility in conjunction with the hatchery, a nonprofit hatchery can also process and market fisheries’ products, but any profit would have to be used for expansion or improvement of facilities, hatcheries research or other authorized purposes of the regional association within which the corporation is located.
June 11, 1984, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 16.10.410.
Hearings before permit issuance.

At least 30 days before the issuance of a permit under AS

16.10.400

, a public hearing shall be held in a central location in the vicinity of the proposed hatchery facility.

Notice of the hearing shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation once a week for three consecutive weeks, with completion of the notice at least 10 days before the hearing.

The hearing shall be conducted by the department. At a hearing for a permit under AS

16.10.400(a)(1)

, the applicant shall present a plan for the proposed hatchery, describing the capacity of the hatchery and other relevant facts that may be of interest to the department or the public. Interested members of the public shall be afforded an opportunity to be heard.

The department shall record and consider objections and recommendations offered by the public at the hearing conducted under this section. It shall respond in writing, within 10 days after the hearing is held, to any specific objections offered by a member of the public at the hearing.

History.

(§ 2 ch 111 SLA 1974; am § 5 ch 14 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For permit application procedures, see 5 AAC 40, art. 4.

Sec. 16.10.420.
Conditions of a permit.

The department shall require, in a permit issued to a hatchery operator, that

salmon eggs procured by the hatchery must be from the department or a source approved by the department;

salmon eggs or resulting fry may not be placed in waters of the state other than those specifically designated in the permit;

salmon eggs or resulting fry, sold to a permit holder by the state or by another party approved by the department, may not be resold or otherwise transferred to another person;

salmon may not be released by the hatchery before department approval, and, for purposes of pathological examination and approval, the department shall be notified of the proposed release of salmon at least 15 days before the date of their proposed release by the hatchery;

diseased salmon be destroyed in a specific manner and place designated by the department;

adult salmon be harvested by hatchery operators only at specific locations as designated by the department;

surplus eggs from salmon returning to the hatchery be made available for sale first to the department and then, after inspection and approval by the department, to operators of other hatcheries authorized by permit to operate under AS

16.10.400

—

16.10.470

;

if surplus salmon eggs are sold by a permit holder to another permit holder, a copy of the sales transaction be provided to the department;

a hatchery be located in an area where a reasonable segregation from natural stocks occurs, but, when feasible, in an area where returning hatchery fish will pass through traditional salmon fisheries.

History.

(§ 2 ch 111 SLA 1974; am § 5 ch 110 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (9) was formerly (10). Renumbered in 2012 to reflect the 1980 repeal of former paragraph (9).

Administrative Code. —

For special harvest areas, see 5 AAC 40, art. 2.

Sec. 16.10.430.
Alteration, suspension, or revocation of permit.

If a permit holder fails to comply with the conditions and terms of the permit issued under AS

16.10.400

—

16.10.470

within a reasonable period after notification of noncompliance by the department, the permit may be suspended or revoked, in the discretion of the commissioner after the regional planning team for the area in which the hatchery is located is notified and granted an opportunity to comment upon the proposed suspension or revocation.

If the commissioner finds that the operation of the hatchery is not in the best interests of the public, the commissioner may alter the conditions of the permit to mitigate the adverse effects of the operation, or, if the adverse effects are irreversible and cannot be mitigated sufficiently, initiate a termination of the operation under the permit over a reasonable period of time under the circumstances, not to exceed four years. During the period of time that the operation is being terminated, the permit holder may harvest salmon under the terms of the permit but may not release additional fish.

History.

(§ 2 ch 111 SLA 1974; am § 4 ch 154 SLA 1977)

Administrative Code. —

For permit application procedures, see 5 AAC 40, art. 4.

Sec. 16.10.440.
Regulations relating to released fish.

Fish released into the natural waters of the state by a hatchery operated under AS

16.10.400

—

16.10.470

are available to the people for common use and are subject to regulation under applicable law in the same way as fish occurring in their natural state until they return to the specific location designated by the department for harvest by the hatchery operator.

The Board of Fisheries may, after the issuance of a permit by the commissioner, amend by regulation adopted in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), the terms of the permit relating to the source and number of salmon eggs, the harvest of fish by hatchery operators, and the specific locations designated by the department for harvest. The Board of Fisheries may not adopt any regulations or take any action regarding the issuance or denial of any permits required in AS

16.10.400

—

16.10.470

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 111 SLA 1974; am § 24 ch 206 SLA 1975; am § 3 ch 59 SLA 1979)

Administrative Code. —

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 21, art. 3.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 33, art. 3.

For special harvest areas, see 5 AAC 40, art. 2.

Sec. 16.10.443.
Department assistance and cooperation.

Before and after permit issuance under AS

16.10.400

—

16.10.470

, the department shall make every effort, within the limits of time and resources, to advise and assist applicants or permit holders, as appropriate, in the planning, construction, or operation of salmon hatcheries.

Nothing in this section exempts an applicant or permit holder from compliance with AS

16.10.400

—

16.10.470

or from compliance with the regulations or restrictions adopted under AS

16.10.400

—

16.10.470

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 97 SLA 1975)

Sec. 16.10.445.
Egg sources.

The department shall approve the source and number of salmon eggs taken under AS

16.10.400

—

16.10.470

.

Where feasible, salmon eggs utilized by a hatchery operator shall first be taken from stocks native to the area in which the hatchery is located, and then, upon department approval, from other areas, as necessary.

History.

(§ 2 ch 111 SLA 1974)

Sec. 16.10.450.
Sale of salmon and salmon eggs: use of proceeds; quality and price.

Except as otherwise provided in a contract for the operation of a hatchery under AS

16.10.480

, a hatchery operator who sells salmon returning from the natural waters of the state, or sells salmon eggs to another hatchery operating under AS

16.10.400

—

16.10.470

, after utilizing the funds for reasonable operating costs, including debt retirement, expanding its facilities, salmon rehabilitation projects, fisheries research, or costs of operating the qualified regional association for the area in which the hatchery is located, shall expend the remaining funds on other fisheries activities of the qualified regional association.

Fish returning to hatcheries and sold for human consumption shall be of comparable quality to fish harvested by commercial fisheries in the area and shall be sold at prices commensurate with the current market.

History.

(§ 2 ch 111 SLA 1974; am § 5 ch 154 SLA 1977; am § 6 ch 14 SLA 1988)

Sec. 16.10.455.
Cost recovery fisheries.

A hatchery permit holder may harvest salmon for a facility in

a special harvest area through agents, or employees of or persons under contract with the permit holder as provided under a permit from the department or regulations of the Board of Fisheries; or

a terminal harvest area through the common property fishery under this section.

A hatchery permit holder may, by a majority vote of the membership of the hatchery permit holder’s board, elect to harvest surplus salmon produced at a facility in a terminal harvest area established for that facility through the common property fishery. At the request of the hatchery permit holder and if the commissioner of fish and game determines that there are no allocative issues involved, and after reasonable consultation with affected commercial fishermen and the organizations of affected commercial fishermen, the commissioner may adopt regulations governing the harvest of surplus salmon in a terminal harvest area when the hatchery permit holder elects to harvest surplus salmon produced at a facility through a common property fishery. The regulations must specify the terms, conditions, and rules under which the common property fishery in the terminal harvest area shall be conducted, including requirements for hold inspections and reporting of harvests and sales of salmon taken in the terminal harvest area. Following adoption of regulations by the department, each year before March 10, the hatchery permit holder’s board, by a majority vote of the board’s membership, may determine whether the hatchery will operate under the regulations adopted under this subsection during the current calendar year, and shall notify the department if the hatchery intends to operate under the regulations adopted under this subsection. The Board of Fisheries may adopt regulations under AS

16.05.251

regarding a fisheries management plan governing operations under this subsection in a terminal harvest area, including allocation plans. Participation in the fishery must be open to all interim-use permit and entry permit holders who hold permits to operate a type of gear that may be used in the fishing district in which the terminal harvest area is located if that type of gear is authorized by regulation to be used in the terminal harvest area. An interim-use permit holder or an entry permit holder who takes salmon in a common property fishery in a terminal harvest area may sell the salmon to any fish buyer or processor who is licensed to do business in the state.

As a condition of participation in a common property salmon fishery in a terminal harvest area under this section, a fisherman who participates in the fishery is subject to the payment of the assessment levied under (d) of this section on the projected value of the salmon or on the pounds of salmon harvested. The assessment is levied on the salmon that the fisherman takes in the terminal harvest area and sells to a licensed buyer. The buyer of the salmon must be licensed under AS 43.75, and the buyer shall collect the assessment on salmon taken in a terminal harvest area at the time of purchase and remit the assessment to the Department of Revenue in accordance with regulations adopted by the Department of Revenue.

The Department of Revenue may, by regulation, annually, by March 1 of each year, set the assessment levied on salmon taken in a terminal harvest area in consultation with the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, the hatchery permit holder, and representatives of affected commercial fishermen. The assessment shall provide sufficient revenue to cover debt service to the state, reasonable operating expenses, reasonable maintenance expenses, and development or maintenance of a reserve fund up to 100 percent of annual operating costs of the hatchery permit holder. In setting the assessment, the department shall consider the estimated return and harvest of salmon in the terminal harvest area, the projected price to be paid for salmon in the region, the amount of the existing reserve held by the hatchery permit holder, and the amount by which the assessment collected in previous years exceeded or fell short of the amount anticipated to be collected. The assessment may not exceed 50 percent of the value of the salmon. The department may levy the assessment as a percentage of the projected value of the salmon returning to the terminal harvest area or as a flat rate on each pound of salmon harvested in the area, to the nearest whole cent.

The Department of Revenue shall deposit the assessments collected under this section in the general fund. The legislature may appropriate the funds collected under this section to the hatchery permit holder who operates a facility in the terminal harvest area in which the assessment was levied. A hatchery permit holder shall use funds appropriated under this subsection for the purposes set out under AS

16.10.450(a)

. The legislature may also appropriate funds collected under this section to the Department of Revenue for costs incurred by the department under this section.

A person who violates a regulation adopted under (b) of this section is guilty of a violation under AS

16.05.722

or a misdemeanor under AS

16.05.723

. A person who violates a regulation adopted by the Department of Revenue under (c) of this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

In this section,

“facility” means a hatchery or salmon rehabilitation project for which a permit is issued under AS

16.10.400

—

16.10.470

;

“special harvest area” means an area designated by the commissioner or the Board of Fisheries where salmon returning to a hatchery may be harvested by the hatchery operators, and, in some situations, by the common property fishery;

“terminal harvest area” means a harvest area, which may include a hatchery release site, established by the commissioner or the Board of Fisheries where salmon returning to a hatchery may be harvested by the common property fishery;

“value” has the meaning given in AS

43.75.290

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 92 SLA 2006; am §§ 1, 2 ch 69 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For a temporary extension of time for payment of an assessment under this section until July 15, 2020, in light of the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared on March 11, 2020, see § 11,
ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

For punishment of misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and
AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 16.10.460.
Inspection of hatchery.

As a condition of and in consideration for a permit to operate a hatchery under AS

16.10.400

—

16.10.470

, an inspection of the hatchery facility by department inspectors shall be permitted by the permit holder at any time the hatchery is operating. The inspection shall be conducted in a reasonable manner.

The cost of an inspection performed by the department under AS

16.10.400

—

16.10.470

shall be borne by the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 111 SLA 1974; am § 4 ch 110 SLA 1980)

Sec. 16.10.470.
Annual report.

A person who holds a permit for the operation of a salmon hatchery under AS

16.10.400

—

16.10.470

shall submit an annual report no later than December 15 to the department and to the qualified regional association for the area in which the hatchery is located, to include but not be limited to information pertaining to species; brood stock source; number, age, weight, and length of spawners; number of eggs taken and fry fingerling produced; and the number, age, weight, and length of adult returns attributable to hatchery releases, on a form to be provided by the department.

A person who holds a permit for the operation of a salmon hatchery under AS

16.10.400

—

16.10.470

and each regional association levying a voluntary assessment under AS

16.10.540

shall submit an annual financial report to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development on a form to be provided by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

History.

(§ 2 ch 111 SLA 1974; am § 6 ch 154 SLA 1977; am § 4 ch 59 SLA 1979; am § 31 ch 14 SLA 1987)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (b) of this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in (b) of this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For applicability of regulations, see 5 AAC 40, art. 3.

Sec. 16.10.475.
Definitions. [Repealed, § 32 ch 14 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 16.10.480.
Contracts for the operation of state hatcheries.

If the department determines that it is unable to continue operating a state-owned hatchery or that it is in the best interest of the state to provide for the operation of the hatchery by another person or by another person in cooperation with the state, the department may enter into a contract for the operation or cooperative operation of the hatchery.

Notwithstanding AS 36.30, when selecting a contractor under (a) of this section, the department shall give a preference to the regional association organized under AS

16.10.380

that is located in the region in which the hatchery is located. If the department determines that the preferred regional association does not meet the criteria established by the department for the contract, the department may not award the contract to the preferred regional association and shall procure the contract under AS 36.30 after considering the recommendations of the preferred regional association.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a contract entered into under this section must provide that the hatchery will be operated under AS

16.10.400

—

16.10.470

and the regulations adopted under those sections.

The department may issue to a contractor who operates a hatchery under this section a permit to harvest adult salmon during the term of the contract at locations designated by the department. The contractor shall use funds received from the sale of adult salmon harvested under the permit to recover all or part of the costs of operating the hatchery and may use the remaining funds for improvements to the hatchery or other salmon enhancement or rehabilitation projects, fisheries research, or the contractor’s reasonable operating or administrative costs in the region in which the hatchery is located including debt retirement or for other fisheries activities of the contractor.

A contract under this section for the operation of a hatchery may not affect the state’s ownership of the hatchery and does not affect the state’s responsibility to manage the resource.

The operation of a hatchery under a contract authorized by this section shall be conducted in accordance with the fisheries management and production goals of the department, and must be consistent with the comprehensive regional salmon plan approved under AS

16.10.375

. During the term of the contract, the department may order changes in the operation of the hatchery that are necessary to ensure consistency with the production goals of the comprehensive regional salmon plan. The contract must specify the species to be raised and the production goals for each species, and these specifications must comply with the comprehensive regional salmon plan. The department may terminate a contract if the contractor fails to operate the hatchery in accordance with the requirements established by and under this subsection.

History.

(§ 1 ch 14 SLA 1988; am §§ 1, 2 ch 84 SLA 1994)

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent on ch. 14, SLA 1988 (CCS SB 410), see 1988 Senate Journal 2422.